Washington statutes.
RCW 2.06.090

Practice of law, seeking nonjudicial elective office prohibited.

No judge, while in office, shall engage in the practice of law. No judge shall run for elective office other than a judicial office during the term for which he or she was elected.

[ 2011 c 336 s 12; 1969 ex.s. c 221 s 9.]